Tennessee, session 114, SB1801.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-2-102, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting instead:
(a) A citizen of the United States eighteen (18) years of age or older who is a
resident of this state is a qualified voter unless the citizen is:
(1) Disqualified under this title; or
(2) Currently imprisoned in a penal institution, on probation, or on parole
for a judgment of infamy pursuant to § 40-20-112.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-2-139(a), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(4) The person's right of suffrage has been restored due to the expiration of the
sentence imposed for the infamous crime.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-19-143(a), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead:
(a) The following provisions govern the exercise of the right of suffrage for those
persons convicted of an infamous crime:
(1) A person who has been convicted of an infamous crime, as defined
by § 40-20-112, in this state shall not register to vote or vote at any election
unless:
(A) The person has been pardoned by the governor. However,
the governor may attach to any such pardon a special condition that such
SB1801
011424
- 1 -

person shall not have the right of suffrage until a date certain in the future,
or until the expiration of the pardoned sentence, whichever period of time
is less;
(B) The person's full rights of citizenship have been restored as
prescribed by law; or
(C) The person's right of suffrage has been restored due to the
expiration of the sentence imposed for the infamous crime;
(2) A person who has been convicted in federal court of a crime or
offense that would constitute an infamous crime under the laws of this state,
regardless of the sentence imposed, shall not register to vote or vote at any
election unless:
(A) The person has been pardoned or the person's full rights of
citizenship have been restored by the president of the United States;
(B) The person's full rights of citizenship have otherwise been
restored in accordance with federal law or the law of this state; or
(C) The person's right of suffrage has been restored due to the
expiration of the sentence imposed for the infamous crime; and
(3) A person who has been convicted in another state of a crime or
offense that would constitute an infamous crime under the laws of this state,
regardless of the sentence imposed, shall not register to vote or vote at any
election in this state unless:
(A) The person has been pardoned or the person's full rights of
citizenship have been restored by the governor or other appropriate
authority of such other state;
- 2 - 011424

(B) The person's full rights of citizenship have otherwise been
restored in accordance with the laws of such other state, or the law of this
state; or
(C) The person's right of suffrage has been restored due to the
expiration of the sentence imposed for the infamous crime.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-29-102, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a), and except as provided in subsections (b)
and (c), a person's right of suffrage is automatically restored upon the person's
discharge from custody by reason of service or expiration of the maximum sentence
imposed by the court for the infamous crime. A county election commission shall accept
the person's discharge documentation as proof of the restoration of the right of suffrage.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-29-103, is amended by deleting
subsection (g) and subdivisions (a)(4), (e)(1)(A), (e)(2)(A)(ii), and (e)(2)(B).
SECTION 6. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to sentences completed or expired, or crimes that have been pardoned, after such
date.
- 3 - 011424